Alaska, session 34, HB250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 11.56 is amended by adding a new section to article 6 to read: 05 Sec. 11.56.880. Wearing a mask in public while acting as a peace officer. 06 (a) A peace officer commits the crime of wearing a mask in public while acting as a 07 peace officer if, while interacting with the public in the peace officer's official 08 capacity, the peace officer knowingly conceals the peace officer's face with a mask or 09 disguise. 10 (b) This section does not apply to a peace officer who 11 (1) is on an undercover assignment that is authorized by the officer's 12 supervisor or by a court order; 13 (2) is wearing 14 (A) a shield that does not obscure the peace officer's face that is 01 designed to protect the peace officer's face from harm; 02 (B) a medical mask or surgical mask designed to protect 03 against transmission of disease or infection or any other mask or device, 04 including an air-purifying respirator, a full or half mask, or a self-contained 05 breathing apparatus, necessary to protect against exposure to a toxin, gas, 06 smoke, inclement weather, or another hazardous or harmful environmental 07 condition; 08 (C) a mask for protection against exposure to smoke; 09 (D) a mask while outdoors when the temperature is at or below 10 32 degrees Fahrenheit; 11 (E) a helmet if the officer is using a motorcycle or other vehicle 12 that requires a helmet for safe operation while in the performance of the 13 officer's duties; 14 (3) is participating in a tactical operation for which protective gear is 15 required for immediate physical safety; in this paragraph, "tactical operation" means a 16 planned or emergent law enforcement activity 17 (A) involving the elevated risk of death or serious physical 18 injury, specialized operational methods, or hazardous environmental 19 conditions; and 20 (B) for which a peace officer's use of protective equipment that 21 partially or fully covers the face is reasonably necessary for officer safety or 22 mission execution and is not intended to conceal the officer's identity; 23 (4) is assigned to a special weapons and tactics team and is actively 24 performing responsibilities of that team. 25 (c) Wearing a mask in public while acting as a peace officer is a class B 26 misdemeanor. 27 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 28 read: 29 APPLICABILITY. AS 11.56.880, enacted by sec. 1 of this Act, applies to offenses 30 committed on or after the effective date of this Act. 31 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.